Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.220

Community and migrant health centers—Maternity health care centers—People of color—Underserved populations.

(1) State general funds appropriated to the department of health for the purposes of funding community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services shall be transferred to the state health care authority. Any related administrative funds expended by the department of health for this purpose shall also be transferred to the health care authority. The health care authority shall exclusively expend these funds through contracts with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services. The director of the health care authority shall establish requirements necessary to assure community health centers provide quality health care services that are appropriate and effective and are delivered in a cost-efficient manner. The director shall further assure that community health centers have appropriate referral arrangements for acute care and medical specialty services not provided by the community health centers.

(2) The authority, in consultation with the department of health, shall work with community and migrant health clinics and other providers of care to underserved populations, to ensure that the number of people of color and underserved people receiving access to managed care is expanded in proportion to need, based upon demographic data.

[ 2023 c 51 s 15; 1998 c 245 s 38; 1993 c 492 s 232.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.